Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.24
Inspection, defined.

Inspection means a surface-by-surface investigation to determine the presence of lead-based paint and the provision of a report explaining the results of the investigation.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 26.